Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.197

Medicare supplemental insurance policies.

The medicare supplemental insurance policies authorized under RCW 41.05.195 shall be made available to any resident of the state who:

(1) Is enrolled in parts A and B of medicare; and

(2) Is not eligible to purchase coverage as a retired or disabled employee under RCW 41.05.195. State residents purchasing a medicare supplemental insurance policy under this section shall be required to pay the full cost of any such policy.

[ 2005 c 47 s 2; 1993 c 492 s 223.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.